Hawaii statutes.
C. Career and Technical Education Under
Federal Aid

[§304A-301] State board for career and
technical education; designation. The board of regents is designated as
the state board for career and technical education. The chairperson of the
board of regents is designated as the chairperson of the state board for career
and technical education and the president of the university is designated as
the administrative officer of the state board for career and technical
education. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next